Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska3-206
Acquisition of property; purposes.

(1) The acquisition of any lands for the purpose of establishing airports or other air navigation facilities, (2) the acquisition of airport protection privileges, (3) the acquisition, establishment, construction, enlargement, improvement, maintenance, equipment, and operation of airports and other air navigation facilities, and (4) the exercise of any other powers herein granted to municipalities are hereby declared to be public, governmental, and municipal functions exercised for a public purpose and matters of public necessity. Such lands and other property, easements, and privileges acquired and used by such municipalities in the manner and for the purposes enumerated in the Revised Airports Act shall and are hereby declared to be public property.

Laws 1945, c. 34, § 3(1), p. 158;

Laws 2001, LB 173, § 3.

The statutes governing airports were not expressly or impliedly repealed by the passage of the 1998 constitutional amendment to Neb. Const. art. VIII, sec. 2, or subsection (1)(a) of section 77-202. Airports owned and operated by municipalities are exempt from taxation. City of York v. York Cty. Bd. of Equal., 266 Neb. 297, 664 N.W.2d 445 (2003).

Declaration of public purpose does not determine whether operation of airport is in a governmental or in a proprietary capacity. Brasier v. Cribbett, 166 Neb. 145, 88 N.W.2d 235 (1958).